tr: Temizleyici amacı: Çok amaçlı; Güverte; Gövde; Metal; Vinil; Diğer
fr: Objectif plus propre: Tout usage; Pont; Coque; Métal; Vinyl; Autre
fi: Puhdistimeni tarkoitus: Monikäyttöinen; Kansi; Köli; Metalli; Vinyyli; Muu
zh-TW: 清潔用途: 萬用; 甲板; 船體; 金屬; 乙烯基; 其他
hu: Tisztító használata: Univerzális; Fedélzet; Hajótest; Fém; Vinil; Egyéb
cs: Účel čističe: Všechny účely; Paluba; Trup; Kov; Vinylové; Jiné
es: Propósito del limpiador: Multiuso; Cubierta; Casco; Metal; Vinilo; Otros
en: Cleaner purpose: All-purpose; Deck; Hull; Metal; Vinyl; Other
zh-CN: 清洁剂/去污剂用途: 通用; 甲板; 船体; 金属; 乙烯基贴纸; 其他
th: วัตถุประสงค์ของน้ำยาทำความสะอาด: อเนกประสงค์; สำหรับดาดฟ้าเรือ; สำหรับตัวเรือ; โลหะ; ไวนิล; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Namenska uporaba čistila: Vsestransko; Krov; Trup; Kovina; Vinil; Drugo
nb: Rensemiddelformål: Flerbruk; Dekk; Skrog; Metall; Vinyl; Annet
sv: Rengöringsmedlets syfte: Alla ändamål; Däck; Skrov; Metall; Vinyl; Övrigt
da: Renseformål: Universal; Dæk; Skrog; Metal; Vinyl; Andet
ja: クリーナーの用途: 多目的; デッキ; 船体; 金属; ビニール; その他
lt-LT: Valiklio paskirtis: Universalus; Denio; Korpuso; Metalas; Vinilas; Kita
ro-RO: Destinație de utilizare produs de curățare: Utilizare universală; Punte; Carenă; Metal; Vinil; Altele
ru: Назначение чистящего средства: Универсальный; Палуба; Корпус; Металл; Винил; Другое
pt-PT: Finalidade de limpeza: Multiuso; Convés; Casco; Metal; Vinil; Outro
ko: 클리너 용도: 다용도; 데크; 선체; 금속; 비닐; 기타
nl: Doel schoonmaakmiddel: Universeel; Dek; Romp; Metaal; Vinyl; Andere
pt-BR: Finalidade do limpador: Versátil; Área coberta; Casco; Metal; Vinil; Outro
it: Funzione del detergente: Multiuso; Ponte; Scafo; Metallo; Vinile; Altro
bg-BG: Предназначение на препарат за почистване: Универсално приложение; Палуба; Корпус; Метал; Винил; Други
hr-HR: Namjena sredstva za čišćenje: Za sve namjene; Paluba; Trup; Metal; Vinil; Ostalo
sk-SK: Účel čistiaceho prostriedku: Viacúčelový; Paluba; Trup; Kov; Vinyl; Iné
de: Zweck des Reinigers: Allzweck; Deck; Rumpf; Metall; Vinyl; Sonstiges
pl: Czystszy cel: Ogólnego zastosowania; Blat; Hull; Metal; Winyl; Inne
el: Σκοπός καθαριστικού: Για όλες τις χρήσεις; Δάπεδο εξωτερικού χώρου; Σκάφος; Μέταλλο; Βινύλιο; Άλλο
vi: Mục đích máy hút bụi: Đa năng; Sàn tàu; Thân tàu; Kim loại; Nhựa vinyl; Khác